Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 15 Department of Law

15.010.
Department of Law — Attorney General as head — Major organizational units.

The Attorney General is the head of the Department of Law.

The Department of Law shall include the following major organizational units:

Department of Criminal Litigation;

Department of Criminal Investigations;

Public Corruption Division;

Special Victims Division;

Special Investigations Division; and

Protective Intelligence Division;

Office of Special Prosecutions;

Office of Medicaid Fraud and Abuse Control;

Office of Trafficking and Abuse Prevention and Prosecution;

Office of Prosecutors Advisory Council; and

Office of Victims Advocacy;

Department of Civil Litigation;

Office of Consumer Protection;

Office of Civil and Environmental Law;

Open Records and Meetings Division; and

Administrative Hearings Division;

Office of Rate Intervention; and

Office of Senior Protection;

Office of the Solicitor General;

Criminal Appeals Division; and

Civil Appeals Division;

Office of Legal Counsel;

Office of Communications; and

Office of Administrative Services.

HISTORY:

4618-75: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 81, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 28, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 80, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 173, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

15.012.
Division of special investigations. [Repealed.]

15.015.
Practice of law prohibited.

The Attorney General shall not engage in the private practice of law during his term of office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 58, § 2.

15.020.
Chief law officer and adviser — Duty to attend to litigation, write opinions, draft writings — Communication with Legislative Research Commission — When to appear for Commonwealth — Constitutional challenge may be brought in any county.

The Attorney General is the chief law officer of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and all of its departments, commissions, agencies, and political subdivisions, and the legal adviser of all state officers, departments, commissions, and agencies, and when requested in writing shall furnish to them his or her written opinion touching any of their official duties, and shall prepare proper drafts of all instruments of writing required for public use, and shall exercise all common law duties and authority pertaining to the office of the Attorney General under the common law, except when modified by statutory enactment.

The Attorney General shall communicate with the Legislative Research Commission as required by KRS

418.075

.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

48.005

and 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 483, sec. 8, the Attorney General shall appear for the Commonwealth in all cases in the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals wherein the Commonwealth is interested, and shall also commence all actions or enter an appearance in all cases, hearings, and proceedings in and before all other courts, tribunals, or commissions in or out of the state, and attend to all litigation and legal business in or out of the state required of the office by law, or in which the Commonwealth has an interest, and any litigation or legal business that any state officer, department, commission, or agency may have in connection with, or growing out of, his, her, or its official duties, except where it is made the duty of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney to represent the Commonwealth. When any attorney is employed for any said agency, the same shall have the approval of such agency before such employment.

Notwithstanding any other statute or provision to the contrary, the Attorney General may bring any action challenging the constitutionality of a Kentucky statute, executive order, administrative regulation, or order of any cabinet, program cabinet, or department under KRS Chapter 12. The action may be brought in any county where the alleged constitutional harm has occurred or could be reasonably presumed to occur.

If any funds of any kind or nature whatsoever are recovered by or on behalf of the Commonwealth, in any action, including an ex rel. action where the Attorney General has entered an appearance or is a party according to statutory or common law authority, those funds shall be handled under KRS

48.005

.

History.

112-1, 112-5, 2711a-159: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 106, § 4; 1944, ch. 7, § 1; 1976, ch. 62, § 7; 1996, ch. 202, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 483, § 2, effective April 21, 2000; 2012, ch. 110, § 8, effective April 11, 2012; 2021 ch. 173, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

15.025.
Conditions to furnishing opinions.

The Attorney General, when requested in writing, under KRS

15.020

, shall furnish such opinions subject to the following conditions:

When questions of law of interest to the Commonwealth are submitted by a state department, agency, board or commission;

When public questions of law are submitted by either house of the Legislature or by any member of the Legislature;

When public questions of law pertaining to local government are submitted in writing by the proper public official of the county or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth;

When, in the discretion of the Attorney General, the question presented is of such public interest that an Attorney General’s opinion on the subject is deemed desirable and when provided for by regulation pursuant to the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. II, § 3.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Recipient governmental officials are expected to conform to the rulings of the Attorney General; this concept of reasonable expectation of conforming to the Attorney General’s opinion applies until a court decision decrees otherwise in a judicial case, or the General Assembly changes the law. The concept of conforming to such opinions is in the public interest, for reasons of consistency and uniform interpretation and administrative or executive action ensuing therefrom.

OAG 84-136

.

15.030.
Written opinions; drafting writings. [Repealed.]

15.040.
When to appear for commonwealth. [Repealed.]

15.050.
Employment of other counsel by state officers and agencies. [Repealed.]

15.055.
Publication of list of delinquent child support obligors — Distribution of “most wanted” posters.

The Office of the Attorney General shall receive from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services a list of names of delinquent obligors as defined in administrative regulations promulgated under this section.

The Office of the Attorney General in cooperation with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

The Office of the Attorney General shall:

Publish and update the list on an appropriate agency Internet site; and

Distribute to all designees of the cabinet for the administration of the child support program, a “most wanted” poster that includes names, and photos if available, of delinquent obligors whose whereabouts are unknown or unverified, or who if known, refuse to meet their child support obligations. The poster shall be posted locally by the designee of the cabinet for the administration of the child support program in public locations.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 430, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 76, effective June 20, 2005.

15.060.
Actions to collect and recover money due Commonwealth with assistance of Department Revenue, Auditor of Public Accounts, or any other appropriate agency.

The Attorney General may:

With the assistance of the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Department of Revenue, or any other appropriate agency, investigate the condition of any unsatisfied claim, demand, account, and judgment in favor of the Commonwealth.

When he believes that any fraudulent, erroneous or illegal fee bill, account, credit, charge or claim has been erroneously or improperly approved, allowed or paid out of the Treasury to any person, institute the necessary actions to recover the same. To this end he may employ assistants and experts to assist in examining the fee bills, accounts, settlements, credits and claims, and the books, records and papers of any of the officers of the Commonwealth.

Institute the necessary actions to collect and cause the payment into the Treasury of all unsatisfied claims, demands, accounts and judgments in favor of the Commonwealth, except where specific statutory authority is given the Department of Revenue to do so.

Comply with KRS

48.005

, if any funds of any kind or nature whatsoever are recovered by or on behalf of the Commonwealth, in any legal action, including an ex rel. action in which the Attorney General has entered an appearance or is a party under statutory or common law authority.

History.

112-1, 340a-3; 2000, ch. 483, § 3, effective April 21, 2000; 2004, ch. 192, § 6, effective April 21, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 38, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 173, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

15.070.
Index book of cases — Opinions to be kept on file.

The Attorney General shall keep in his office an index book, in which shall be entered the number and style of each case in which the Commonwealth is interested and the court in which it is pending, and a brief statement of the nature of the case and the steps taken therein.

He shall also keep on file in his office, subject to public inspection, all opinions rendered by him, alphabetically arranged.

History.

112-6.

15.080.
Biennial report to Governor.

The Attorney General shall biennially, on or before December 31 preceding each regular session of the General Assembly, report to the Governor a full statement of the business done in his office.

History.

112-7.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Akers, The Advisory Opinion Function of the Attorney General, 38 Ky. L.J. 561 (1950).

15.090.
Appeals.

The Attorney General may prosecute an appeal, without security, in any case from which an appeal will lie whenever, in his judgment, the interest of the Commonwealth demands it.

History.

116: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 62, § 8; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 2.

15.100.
Deputy attorney general, solicitor general, assistant deputy attorneys general, assistants, special attorneys and contract attorneys.

The Attorney General shall appoint a deputy attorney general, who shall have the same qualifications required of a Circuit Judge except for residence in a district and who shall receive the same salary as a Circuit Judge, to serve at the pleasure of the Attorney General and to perform the duties he or she may designate. The Attorney General may appoint two (2) assistant deputy attorneys general, who shall have the same qualifications required of a District Judge except for residence in a district and who shall receive the same salary as a District Judge, to serve at the pleasure of the Attorney General and to perform the duties he or she may designate. In addition thereto, he or she shall appoint a solicitor general to serve at the pleasure of the Attorney General and to perform the duties he or she may designate and shall set his or her salary.

In addition to the deputy attorney general, the Attorney General shall appoint such assistants and special attorneys as he or she deems necessary to transact the business of the Department of Law, and to perform the duties he or she may designate. The deputy attorney general, assistant deputy attorneys general, assistants, and special attorneys shall have full power, as authorized and under the direction of the Attorney General, to perform such duties as may be performed by the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall be responsible for the official acts of his or her deputy, assistant deputy attorneys general, assistants, and special attorneys.

In addition to the appointment and designation of a deputy, assistant deputy attorneys general, assistants, and special attorneys pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the Attorney General may enter into such contracts for legal services as he or she deems necessary and advisable. Such contracts shall be subject to the relevant provisions of the Kentucky Model Procurement Code in KRS Chapter 45A.

Each assistant or special attorney so appointed or designated shall be a person admitted to the practice of law by the Supreme Court of this Commonwealth and shall qualify by taking the oath of office.

History.

112-3: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 14, § 1; 1950, ch. 123, § 29; 1960, ch. 68, Art. II, § 5; 1976, ch. 62, § 9; 1988, ch. 362, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2018 ch. 87, § 5, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

15.105.
Assistant attorneys general for certain agencies.

The Attorney General, with the approval of the head of the cabinet involved, shall appoint assistant attorneys general for the Transportation Cabinet and the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The assistant attorneys general and additional attorneys provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall each be a person admitted to the practice of law by the Supreme Court of this Commonwealth and shall qualify by taking the oath of office. They shall be paid out of the appropriation or other funds of the respective agency to which they are assigned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. II, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 19; 1976, ch. 62, § 10; 1976, ch. 88, § 17, effective March 29, 1976; 1984, ch. 111, § 19, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 340, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 417, § 8, effective December 1, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 39, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Assistant Attorney General to aid county attorney, KRS

393.190

.

15.110.
Assistant Attorney General for Department of Highways. [Repealed.]

15.111.
Division of Administrative Hearings.

The Division of Administrative Hearings is created in the Office of Attorney General.

This division shall have the following responsibilities:

Employing and maintaining a pool of hearing officers for assignment to the individual agencies at their request, for the conduct of administrative hearings. The Attorney General’s office may also employ other staff as necessary to carry out functions and responsibilities assigned by KRS Chapter 13B;

Reviewing and approving or disapproving requests from agencies for waivers from provisions of KRS Chapter 13B;

Providing training in administrative hearing procedures for hearing officers as required in KRS

13B.030

, either by developing and offering the training, or by contracting with appropriate organizations for the provision of training, or by approving training developed and submitted by the agencies;

Consulting with the Personnel Cabinet and employing agencies in the establishment of relevant and appropriate qualifications for classes of hearing officers;

Establishing, in cooperation with the Division of Consumer Protection, a clearinghouse for complaints concerning the administrative hearing process in Kentucky. Each complaint received shall be referred to the agency that is the subject of the complaint, and the action of the agency to resolve the complaint shall be noted and reported to the division;

Reporting to the Legislative Research Commission by July 1 of each odd-numbered year, the status of the administrative hearing process in Kentucky. The report shall include a compilation of statistical data and other information necessary to assess the effectiveness and efficiency of hearing procedures and recommendations for making improvements to the system. Agencies shall provide the information requested by the Division of Administrative Hearings necessary to complete the report.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 382, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

15.113.
Attorney General may investigate certain illegal or fraudulent activity — Prevention of identity theft.

The Attorney General may investigate the use of personal identification and financial information by persons for the purpose of theft, fraud, or both, or any other illegal or fraudulent activity that may involve electronic commerce, the use of public funds or property, or obtaining or attempting to obtain a benefit provided by the government.

The Attorney General shall coordinate with the Department of Financial Institutions, the United States Secret Service, the Federal Trade Commission, the Kentucky Bankers’ Association, and any other agency or organization to prepare and disseminate information to prevent identity theft.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 175, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 77, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 13, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 173, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

15.115.
Additional Assistant Attorneys-General for Department of Highways. [Repealed.]

15.120.
Assistant Attorney-General for Public Service Commission. [Repealed.]

15.130.
Assistant Attorney-General for alcoholic beverage control. [Repealed.]

15.140.
Assistant Attorney General for Department of Revenue. [Repealed.]

15.145.
Assistant attorney general for Railroad Commission. [Repealed.]

15.150.
Stenographic, investigative and clerical help.

The Attorney General may employ such stenographic, investigative and other clerical help for the use and benefit of his department as he deems necessary for the proper conduct of his office, within the limits of appropriations made for that purpose. Investigative personnel as designated by the Attorney General shall have the power of peace officers.

History.

112-3: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 269, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

15.160.
Salary of Attorney General. [Repealed.]

15.170.
Expenses of Attorney General and assistants when away from capital.

The Attorney General and the assistant attorneys general shall be paid their actual and necessary expenses when called away from the state capital on business of the Commonwealth.

History.

112-4.

15.180.
Power to promulgate regulations.

The Attorney General may promulgate and file with the Legislative Research Commission those rules and regulations which will facilitate performing the duties and exercising the authority vested in the Attorney General and the Department of Law by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. II, § 1, effective March 17, 1960.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Montague III, The Office of Attorney General in Kentucky, 49 Ky. L.J. 194 (1960).